District of Columbia statutes.
11-1203

Rules and regulations.

The Superior Court may make such rules and regulations for conducting business in the Tax Division, consistent with the statutes applicable to such business and with the Superior Court’s general rules of practice and procedure, as it may deem necessary and proper. Rules and regulations for the Tax Division shall, insofar as possible, assure the prompt disposition of matters before the Tax Division to the end that the taxing statutes of the District of Columbia shall be fairly and efficiently enforced.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 489, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
Rules of Superior Court, see § 11-946.
Superior Court, small claims and conciliation procedures, applicability of other laws, see § 16-3901.
1981 Ed., § 11-1203.
1973 Ed., § 11-1203.